Louisiana, session 2026, HB405.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1358 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1358. Licensed acupuncturists
The board shall certify as a licensed acupuncturist an individual who meets
both of the following:
(1) Holds active status with the National Certification Commission for
Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine National Certification Board for Acupuncture
and Herbal Medicine.
(2) Has successfully passed the certification examination, including the
Biomedicine portion of the examination, given by the National Certification
Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine National Certification Board
for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.